Missouri, session 2026, HB3120.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 110.240, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 110.240, to read as follows:
110.240. 1. It is the duty of the county treasurer to draw a check as county treasurer
upon a county depositary in favor of the legal holder thereof, and to charge the same to the
fund upon which it is drawn. No county treasurer shall draw any check upon the funds in any
depositary unless there is sufficient money belonging to the fund upon which the check is
drawn to pay the same, and no money belonging to the county shall be paid by any depositary
except upon checks of the county treasurer. In case any bonds, coupons or other indebtedness
of the county are payable by the terms of the bonds, coupons or other debts at any particular
place other than the treasury of the county, nothing contained in this section shall prevent any
county commission from causing the treasurer to place a sufficient sum at the place where
such debts shall be payable, at the time of their maturity, to meet the same.
2. As provided in this section and in sections 50.166 and 54.140, the county
treasurer’s signature shall be the only signature authorized or permitted on any bank
signature card, deposit agreement, or other authorization document for any account
maintained in a county depositary for county funds under the treasurer’s custody. No
other county official or employee shall be authorized or required to be listed as a signer
on any such account. Each county depositary shall ensure compliance with this
subsection.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3120 2
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any other county officer
from maintaining a separate account or accounts specifically authorized by statute for
the performance of that officer’s official duties.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or otherwise affect the
authority of the county commission under section 50.160 to request or obtain
information, accounts, records, or other financial documentation from the county
treasurer.
✔